Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201660-3,159
Registration fees; fees for previous
years.

Upon application to register any motor vehicle or
trailer, no registration fee shall be required to be paid thereon for any
previous registration period during which such motor vehicle or trailer was
not at any time driven or used upon any highway within this state, and the
person desiring to register such motor vehicle or trailer without payment
of fees for previous registration periods shall file with the county treasurer an
affidavit showing where, when, and for how long such motor vehicle or trailer
was stored and that the same was not used in this state during such registration
period or periods, and upon receipt thereof the county treasurer shall
issue a registration certificate.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 159;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 86.